apertium-evn.evn.lexc
LEXICON A-N-INFL

NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
%<comp%>:н%>%{D%}%{ы%}м%{A%}р NOMINAL-INFL ;
%<comp%>:н%>%{D%}%{ы%}м%{Э%}р NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
%<sup%>:н%>%{D%}%{ы%}%{G%}у NOMINAL-INFL ;
%<sup%>:н%>%{D%}%{ы%}%{G%}у NOMINAL-INFL ;
%<ints1%>:н%>к%{A%}ку%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
%<ints1%>:н%>к%{Э%}ку%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<ints1%>:н%>к%{Э%}к%{Э%}%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<ints2%>:н%>м%{A%}м%{A%} NOMINAL-INFL ;
%<ints2%>:н%>м%{Э%}м%{Э%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
%<ints2%>:н%>м%{Э%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
%<atten1%>:н%>к%{A%}%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
%<atten1%>:н%>к%{Э%}%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<atten2%>:н%>ми NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
%<advz1%>:н%>м%{A%}т ADV ;
%<advz1%>:н%>м%{Э%}т ADV ; ! Dir/LR
%<advz2%>:н%>ди ADV ;

LEXICON A-N

A-N-INFL ;
%<pchu%>:пчу A-N-INFL ; ! form adjectives from qualitative adjectives

LEXICON ADJ-N

%<adj%>: A-N ;

!===================!
! Verbal inflection !
!===================!

LEXICON V-PERS-1-P1P2-SG

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{i%}м CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{i%}м%{A%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{i%}м%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{i%}нни CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ндэ CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL

%<p1%>%<pe%>:%>в CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pe%>:%>вун CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL

%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>н CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>п CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-1

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>нни CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ндэ CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>н CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pe%>:%>в CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pe%>:%>вун CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>п CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>т CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-2-WITHOUT-P3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>в CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pe%>:%>вун CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>т CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>лты CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>сун CLITICS ;

!LEXICON V-PERS-2-P1PI-P3PL

!%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>п CLITICS ;
!%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>н CLITICS ; ! или опечатка на p.263?

LEXICON V-PERS-2

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>в CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>н CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pe%>:%>вун CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>т CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>лты CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>сун CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>тын CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>тин CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON NFUT-IRREG

%<nfut-irreg%>:д%{A%}%{ː%} V-PERS-2 ;
%<nfut-irreg%>:д%{Э%}%{ː%} V-PERS-2 ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON PRES

%<pres%>:%>%{D%}%{Я%} V-PERS-1-P1P2-SG ;
%<pres%>:%>%{D%}%{Е%} V-PERS-1-P1P2-SG ; ! Dir/LR
%<pres%>:%>%{D%}%{Я%}р%{A%} V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL ;
%<pres%>:%>%{D%}%{Е%}р%{A%} V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL ; ! Dir/LR
%<pres%>:%>%{D%}%{Я%}р%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL ; ! Dir/LR
%<pres%>:%>%{D%}%{Е%}р%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL ; ! Dir/LR ! Dir/LR
%<pres%>:%>%{D%}%{Я%}р%{A%} V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL ;
%<pres%>:%>%{D%}%{Е%}р%{A%} V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL ; ! Dir/LR
%<pres%>:%>%{D%}%{Я%}р%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL ; ! Dir/LR
%<pres%>:%>%{D%}%{Е%}р%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL ; ! Dir/LR ! Dir/LR

LEXICON NFUT

%<nfut%>: V-PERS-1-P1P2-SG ;
%<nfut%>:%>%{r%}%{A%} V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL ;
%<nfut%>:%>%{r%}%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL ; ! Dir/LR
%<nfut%>:%>%{r%}%{A%} V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL ;
%<nfut%>:%>%{r%}%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL ; ! Dir/LR
%<nfut%>:%>д%{A%} V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL ; ! Dir/LR
%<nfut%>:%>д%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL ; ! Dir/LR
%<nfut%>:%>д%{A%} V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL ; ! Dir/LR
%<nfut%>:%>д%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL ; ! Dir/LR
%<nfut%>:%>н%{A%} V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL ; ! Dir/LR
%<nfut%>:%>н%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL ; ! Dir/LR
%<nfut%>:%>н%{A%} V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL ; ! Dir/LR
%<nfut%>:%>н%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL ; ! Dir/LR

 LEXICON Adjectives 
агӣка̄кун:аги%{ː%}ка%{ː%}ку ADJ-N ; ! 
адыка̄н:адыка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
адыллака̄н:адыллака%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
аивувган:аивувга ADJ-N ; ! 
аӣвукин:аи%{ː%}вуки ADJ-N ; ! 
акӣн:аки%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
алагӯн:алагу%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
ала̄нчэн:ала%{ː%}нчэ ADJ-N ; ! 
албин:алби ADJ-N ; ! 
алтамака̄н:алтамака%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
амикин:амики ADJ-N ; ! 
амталкан:амталка ADJ-N ; ! 
антиптикин:антиптики ADJ-N ; ! разный
антыптыкӣн:антыптыки%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
аӈадяка̄н:аӈадяка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
аракӯка̄н:араку%{ː%}ка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
арамака̄н:арамака%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
арбарин:арбари ADJ-N ; ! 
арунакан:арунака ADJ-N ; ! 
арурин:арури ADJ-N ; ! 
атыркалкан:атыркалка ADJ-N ; ! 
аювувган:аювувга ADJ-N ; ! 
аяка̄н:аяка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
аяман:аяма ADJ-N ; ! 
аяткан:аятка ADJ-N ; ! 
багдамаптыкин:багдамаптыки ADJ-N ; ! 
багдарин:багдари ADJ-N ; ! 
багурин:багури ADJ-N ; ! 
бакала̄н:бакала%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
бараксан:баракса ADJ-N ; ! 
баргиган:баргига ADJ-N ; ! 
баян:бая ADJ-N ; ! 
бегалтан:бегалта ADJ-N ; ! 
бидеӈэ̄н:бидеӈэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
бинэ̄н:бинэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
боӈнон:боӈно ADJ-N ; ! 
булдин:булди ADJ-N ; ! 
бултулин:бултули ADJ-N ; ! 
буруилка̄н:буруилка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
бучукин:бучуки ADJ-N ; ! 
бэлӣн:бэли%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
ва̄вун:ва%{ː%}ву ADJ-N ; ! 
гайка̄н:гайка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
гапралкан:гапралка ADJ-N ; ! 
гелган:гелга ADJ-N ; ! 
гетыкин:гетыки ADJ-N ; ! 
гиллун:гиллу ADJ-N ; ! 
гирила̄н:гирила%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
гогонмо̄н:гогонмо%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
гонодян:гонодя ADJ-N ; ! 
гоһорин:гоһори ADJ-N ; ! 
гулун:гулу ADJ-N ; ! 
гуя̄гин:гуя%{ː%}ги ADJ-N ; ! 
гуялан:гуяла ADJ-N ; ! 
гэлэ̄вдерэн:гэлэ%{ː%}вдерэ ADJ-N ; ! 
давлэн:давлэ ADJ-N ; ! 
дагачӯка̄н:дагачу%{ː%}ка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
даринин:дарини ADJ-N ; ! 
делумнэкэ̄н:делумнэкэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
деммӯкин:демму%{ː%}ки ADJ-N ; ! 
демукин:демуки ADJ-N ; ! "голодный"
додарин:додари ADJ-N ; ! 
долборгида̄ка̄кӯн:долборгида%{ː%}ка%{ː%}ку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
до̄лды̄лан:до%{ː%}лды%{ː%}ла ADJ-N ; ! 
доӈорин:доӈори ADJ-N ; ! 
дукӯвун:дуку%{ː%}ву ADJ-N ; ! 
дулбун:дулбу ADJ-N ; ! 
дулин:дули ADJ-N ; ! 
дулумнукан:дулумнука ADJ-N ; ! 
ды̄вэ̄н:ды%{ː%}вэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
дыгинмэ̄н:дыгинмэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
дыгӣтын:дыги%{ː%}ты ADJ-N ; ! 
дылбирин:дылбири ADJ-N ; ! 
дылин:дыли ADJ-N ; ! 
дырамка̄кӯн:дырамка%{ː%}ку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
дэбдырин:дэбдыри ADJ-N ; ! 
дэгдырин:дэгдыри ADJ-N ; ! 
дю̄ган:дю%{ː%}га ADJ-N ; ! 
дюгэ̄чивун:дюгэ%{ː%}чиву ADJ-N ; ! 
дюлбэкин:дюлбэки ADJ-N ; ! 
дюнмэн:дюнмэ ADJ-N ; ! 
дюрмэн:дюрмэ ADJ-N ; ! 
дядяпкӣтын:дядяпки%{ː%}ты ADJ-N ; ! 
дяндюрин:дяндюри ADJ-N ; ! 
дя̄нма̄н:дя%{ː%}нма%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
дян-тунӈӣтын:дян-тунӈи%{ː%}ты ADJ-N ; ! 
дярун:дяру ADJ-N ; ! 
епӯкэ̄кун:епу%{ː%}кэ%{ː%}ку ADJ-N ; ! 
ӣвгэн:и%{ː%}вгэ ADJ-N ; ! 
игдярин:игдяри ADJ-N ; ! 
иктэвун:иктэву ADJ-N ; ! 
илачивун:илачиву ADJ-N ; ! 
илдыкэвун:илдыкэву ADJ-N ; ! 
илэмэ̄н:илэмэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
имурэ̄чӣкэн:имурэ%{ː%}чи%{ː%}кэ ADJ-N ; ! 
инектэн:инектэ ADJ-N ; ! 
иникин:иники ADJ-N ; ! "живой"
иничэ̄н:иничэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
инкун:инку ADJ-N ; ! 
иӈин:иӈи ADJ-N ; ! 
иргэсэкун:иргэсэку ADJ-N ; ! 
ислан:исла ADJ-N ; ! 
ичэвгэн:ичэвгэ ADJ-N ; ! 
кактырин:кактыри ADJ-N ; ! 
каптака̄н:каптака%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
капчарин:капчари ADJ-N ; ! 
карбума̄н:карбума%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
качин:качи ADJ-N ; ! 
ке̄рка̄н:ке%{ː%}рка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
кикигӣн:кикиги%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
кимэрин:кимэри ADJ-N ; ! 
колдон:колдо ADJ-N ; ! 
коӈномоптыкин:коӈномоптыки ADJ-N ; ! 
короватка̄н:короватка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
кубдурин:кубдури ADJ-N ; ! 
кусилэ̄н:кусилэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
кэтэнмэ̄н:кэтэнмэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
ламуткан:ламутка ADJ-N ; ! 
лён:лё ADJ-N ; ! 
лирбӣмакӯн:лирби%{ː%}маку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
луӈгун:луӈгу ADJ-N ; ! 
лупчурин:лупчури ADJ-N ; ! 
лэптурин:лэптури ADJ-N ; ! 
лэрбэмэкӯн:лэрбэмэку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
манан:мана ADJ-N ; ! 
маӈ̄ча̄ла̄н:маӈ%{ː%}ча%{ː%}ла%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
матавлан:матавла ADJ-N ; ! 
метрополитен:метрополите ADJ-N ; ! 
моӈнон:моӈно ADJ-N ; ! 
мугдырин:мугдыри ADJ-N ; ! 
мудурэ̄н:мудурэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
муллика̄н:муллика%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
муӈкилэмнэн:муӈкилэмнэ ADJ-N ; ! 
мурла̄н:мурла%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
мурче̄н:мурче%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
мэдэн:мэдэ ADJ-N ; ! 
мэ̄мтыкин:мэ%{ː%}мтыки ADJ-N ; ! 
мэ̄нэкэ̄н:мэ%{ː%}нэкэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
мэӈтыкэ̄н:мэӈтыкэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
мэргэн:мэргэ ADJ-N ; ! 
на̄вка̄лэ̄н:на%{ː%}вка%{ː%}лэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
нады̄тын:нады%{ː%}ты ADJ-N ; ! 
налакин:налаки ADJ-N ; ! 
наптака̄н:наптака%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
нектэкун:нектэку ADJ-N ; ! 
некчэрӣн:некчэри%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
не̄ника̄н:не%{ː%}ника%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
никӯн:нику%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
никӯчукӯкэн:нику%{ː%}чуку%{ː%}кэ ADJ-N ; ! 
ниракӯча̄н:нираку%{ː%}ча%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
ниркун:нирку ADJ-N ; ! 
нисамкин:нисамки ADJ-N ; ! 
нисӣмкун:ниси%{ː%}мку ADJ-N ; ! 
ниткӯкэ̄н:нитку%{ː%}кэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
ниткун:нитку ADJ-N ; ! 
ниһимкун:ниһимку ADJ-N ; ! 
номо̄ка̄н:номо%{ː%}ка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
норӣлӣка̄н:нори%{ː%}ли%{ː%}ка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
нэкӯн:нэку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
нэмкукӯн:нэмкуку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
нэмкӯн:нэмку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
нэптэкӯн:нэптэку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
нэсумкӯн:нэсумку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
нюккун:нюкку ADJ-N ; ! 
нюмэкуткэн:нюмэкуткэ ADJ-N ; ! 
нюӈунмэ̄н:нюӈунмэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
нюрарикан:нюрарика ADJ-N ; ! 
нюркӯн:нюрку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
нючакин:нючаки ADJ-N ; ! 
нялбӯрин:нялбу%{ː%}ри ADJ-N ; ! 
няликин:нялики ADJ-N ; ! 
нярбакин:нярбаки ADJ-N ; ! 
ӈиннун:ӈинну ADJ-N ; ! 
ӈо̄нимкура̄ка̄н:ӈо%{ː%}нимкура%{ː%}ка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
ӈэмтэ̄рӣн:ӈэмтэ%{ː%}ри%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
овӣн:ови%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
о̄кӣптыгачин:о%{ː%}ки%{ː%}птыгачи ADJ-N ; ! 
олгорила̄н:олгорила%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
омӣкин:оми%{ː%}ки ADJ-N ; ! 
пама̄тка̄н:пама%{ː%}тка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
пиян:пия ADJ-N ; ! 
пэктырэ̄влэ̄н:пэктырэ%{ː%}влэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
сагданча̄ка̄кун:сагданча%{ː%}ка%{ː%}ку ADJ-N ; ! 
салдыка̄кӯн:салдыка%{ː%}ку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
се̄кала̄н:се%{ː%}кала%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
сигналтывун:сигналтыву ADJ-N ; ! 
симутка̄н:симутка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
сиӈарӣптыкин:сиӈари%{ː%}птыки ADJ-N ; ! 
сирӯкин:сиру%{ː%}ки ADJ-N ; ! 
со̄лӣпкин:со%{ː%}ли%{ː%}пки ADJ-N ; ! 
сӯксиливун:су%{ː%}ксиливу ADJ-N ; ! 
сунчатка̄н:сунчатка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
сучэкӣн:сучэки%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
сэгден:сэгде ADJ-N ; ! 
сэмэн:сэмэ ADJ-N ; ! 
сэрэмэптыкин:сэрэмэптыки ADJ-N ; ! 
талун:талу ADJ-N ; ! 
тардын:тарды ADJ-N ; ! 
торон:торо ADJ-N ; ! 
туен:туе ADJ-N ; ! 
тукала̄н:тукала%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
тумин:туми ADJ-N ; ! 
тургэкэ̄кӯн:тургэкэ%{ː%}ку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
туюлэн:туюлэ ADJ-N ; ! 
тыкулча̄гэчин:тыкулча%{ː%}гэчи ADJ-N ; ! 
тымбарин:тымбари ADJ-N ; ! 
тыргака̄кӯн:тыргака%{ː%}ку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
тэӈгэрин:тэӈгэри ADJ-N ; ! 
тэргэн:тэргэ ADJ-N ; ! 
угӣкӯн:уги%{ː%}ку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
удан:уда ADJ-N ; ! 
улапкӯн:улапку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
умӯккэ̄кэ̄н:уму%{ː%}ккэ%{ː%}кэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
умӯнмэн:уму%{ː%}нмэ ADJ-N ; ! 
ӯникин:у%{ː%}ники ADJ-N ; ! 
уӈурэ̄н:уӈурэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
урумкӯкэ̄н:урумку%{ː%}кэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
урэ̄ткэ̄чин:урэ%{ː%}ткэ%{ː%}чи ADJ-N ; ! 
уян:уя ADJ-N ; ! 
хавалӣктан:хавали%{ː%}кта ADJ-N ; ! 
ханӈӯктавун:ханӈу%{ː%}ктаву ADJ-N ; ! 
харуска̄кӯн:харуска%{ː%}ку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
хима̄ка̄кӯн:хима%{ː%}ка%{ː%}ку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
холмилэ̄н:холмилэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
хуламака̄н:хуламака%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
хулукӯкэ̄н:хулуку%{ː%}кэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
хумӈарӣн:хумӈари%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
хургувун:хургуву ADJ-N ; ! 
хутэклэ̄н:хутэклэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
хэгдыкэ̄кӯн:хэгдыкэ%{ː%}ку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
хэкӯсин:хэку%{ː%}си ADJ-N ; ! 
һемурилан:һемурила ADJ-N ; ! 
һуило̄н:һуило%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! маленький
һунюкун:һунюку ADJ-N ; ! 
чайтывун:чайтыву ADJ-N ; ! 
чатамакин:чатамаки ADJ-N ; ! 
чиривун:чириву ADJ-N ; ! 
чуламака̄н:чуламака%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
чулбаматыкин:чулбаматыки ADJ-N ; ! 
чулупкӣвун:чулупки%{ː%}ву ADJ-N ; ! 
чӯрӣрин:чу%{ː%}ри%{ː%}ри ADJ-N ; ! 
чэлбэн:чэлбэ ADJ-N ; ! 
эбэйкэ̄кӯн:эбэйкэ%{ː%}ку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
эвӣкэ̄н:эви%{ː%}кэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
эимкун:эимку ADJ-N ; ! "лёгкий"
элӯн:элу%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
элэкин:элэки ADJ-N ; ! достаточный
элэркэ̄кун:элэркэ%{ː%}ку ADJ-N ; ! 
эптывун:эптыву ADJ-N ; ! 
эрдыкэ̄н:эрдыкэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
эсикин:эсики ADJ-N ; ! 
юмэкин:юмэки ADJ-N ; ! 
я̄рэка̄кӯн:я%{ː%}рэка%{ː%}ку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
